Massachusetts, session 194th, H3600.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 13T of chapter 23A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official 
edition, is hereby amended, at the end thereof, by inserting the following subsection:- 
(f) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the fund shall not be 
subject to a charge for indirect costs or fringe benefit costs by the comptroller pursuant to section 
5D of chapter 29.